Florida, session 2026, HB215.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of section
193.155, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
193.155 Homestead assessments.—Homestead property shall be
assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving
the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed
at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property
receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8)
apply.
(8) Property assessed under this section shall be assessed
at less than just value when the person who establishes a new
homestead has received a homestead exemption as of January 1 of
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb215-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 215 2026
any of the 3 immediately preceding years. For purposes of this
subsection, a husband and wife who owned and both permanently
resided on a previous homestead shall each be considered to have
received the homestead exemption even though only the husband or
the wife applied for the homestead exemption on the previous
homestead. The assessed value of the newly established homestead
shall be determined as provided in this subsection.
(c)1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2., if two or
more persons who have each received a homestead exemption as of
January 1 of any of the 3 immediately preceding years and who
would otherwise be eligible to have a new homestead property
assessed under this subsection establish a single new homestead,
the reduction from just value is limited to the higher of the
difference between the just value and the assessed value of
either of the prior eligible homesteads as of January 1 of the
year in which either of the eligible prior homesteads was
abandoned, but may not exceed $500,000.
2. If a married couple establishes a single new homestead
under this subsection and each spouse, before the marriage,
received a separate homestead exemption as of January 1 of any
of the 3 immediately preceding years, the reduction from just
value is equal to the combined difference between the just value
and the assessed value of both of the prior eligible homesteads
as of January 1 of the year in which one or both of the
respective eligible prior homesteads were abandoned, but may not
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb215-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 215 2026
exceed a total of $500,000. For purposes of this subparagraph,
the new homestead may be comprised of either of the prior
eligible homesteads.
Section 2. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (5) of
section 200.065, Florida Statutes, to read:
200.065 Method of fixing millage.—
(5) In each fiscal year:
(c) Except as provided in subparagraph (a)2., the prior
year adopted millage rate may only be increased if approved by a
two-thirds vote of the membership of the governing body of the
county, municipality, or independent district.

Any unit of government operating under a home rule charter
adopted pursuant to ss. 10, 11, and 24, Art. VIII of the State
Constitution of 1885, as preserved by s. 6(e), Art. VIII of the
State Constitution, which is granted the authority in the State
Constitution to exercise all the powers conferred now or
hereafter by general law upon municipalities and which exercises
such powers in the unincorporated area shall be recognized as a
municipality under this subsection. For a downtown development
authority established before the effective date of the State
Constitution which has a millage that must be approved by a
municipality, the governing body of that municipality shall be
considered the governing body of the downtown development
authority for purposes of this subsection.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb215-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 215 2026
Section 3. (1) The Department of Revenue is authorized,
and all conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules
pursuant to s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, to implement the
amendments made by this act to ss. 193.155 and 200.065, Florida
Statutes. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, emergency
rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are effective for 6
months after adoption and may be renewed during the pendency of
procedures to adopt permanent rules addressing the subject of
the emergency rules.
(2) This section shall take effect upon this act becoming
a law and expires July 1, 2028.
Section 4. The amendments made by this act to ss. 193.155
and 200.065, Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2027 tax roll.
Section 5. Except as otherwise expressly provided for in
this act and except for this section, which shall take effect
upon becoming a law, this act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb215-00